Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.360

Joint higher education committee—Purpose.

(1) A joint higher education committee is created.

(2) The purpose of the joint higher education committee is to:

(a) By December 1, 2012, and annually thereafter, review the work of the student achievement council and provide legislative feedback;

(b) Engage with the student achievement council and the higher education community to create greater communication, coordination, and alignment between the higher education system and the expectations of the legislature; and

(c) Provide recommendations for higher education policy, including proposed legislation, to the higher education and fiscal committees of the legislature.

[ 2012 c 229 s 201.]